Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 23. Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act
[Repealed]

§§ 93-23-1 through 93-23-47.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 519, § 39 eff July 1, 2004.

§93-23-1. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-3. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-5. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-7. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-9. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-11. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-13. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-15. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-17. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-19. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-21. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-23. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-25. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-27. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-29. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-31. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-33. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-35. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-37. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-39. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-41. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-43. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-45. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]

§93-23-47. [Laws, 1982, ch. 414, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1982.]